Nevada, session 83, SB396.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Department shall establish a program to
provide professional development regarding evidence-based
instruction in foundational literacy, structured literacy and
supplemental reading support to each instructional aide,
paraprofessional, member of support staff, administrator and
teacher, including, without limitation, each library media
specialist and each person with an endorsement to teach a
program of bilingual education or pupils with disabilities. Such
persons must be employed by a school district or charter school to
serve pupils enrolled in preschool, kindergarten or grades 1 to 6,
inclusive.
2. The program to provide professional development
developed by the Department pursuant to subsection 1 must
include, without limitation:
(a) For a person who serves pupils enrolled in kindergarten or
grades 1, 2 or 3, training on:
(1) Orthography;
(2) Phonological and phonemic awareness;
(3) Phonics;
(4) Reading fluency, including, without limitation, reading
orally;
(5) Developing oral and written vocabularies; and
(6) Aural and reading comprehension;
(b) For a person who serves pupils enrolled in grades 4, 5 or 6,
training on:
(1) The neurobiology of reading;
(2) Advanced word study;
(3) Reading fluency; and
(4) Reading comprehension;
(c) For an administrator, training on designing and
implementing high-quality and evidence-based literacy instruction
focused on the science of reading for pupils enrolled in preschool,
kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive; and
(d) For each person described in subsection 1, at least 20
hours of professional development, provided at no cost to the
person during each school year, on the universal literacy
screening administered pursuant to NRS 388.439 and 388.441 and
interventions, accommodations, structured literacy and the use of
-
*SB396_R1*

– 5 –
technology for pupils with reading disabilities, including, without
limitation, dyslexia.
3. The Department shall establish and provide training and
resources for the implementation of:
(a) A statewide framework for using multi-tiered systems of
support to assist in the identification and intervention of pupils at
risk of experiencing a learning disability, including, without
limitation, dyslexia; and
(b) A program to provide professional development, at no cost,
to each person described in subsection 2 regarding the framework
established pursuant to paragraph (a) and methods of intervention
for pupils with disabilities, including, without limitation, pupils
with dyslexia or pupils with a disability that affects the reading
abilities of the pupil.
4. The framework established pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 must include, without limitation:
(a) A problem-solving model that is based on data;
(b) Frequent assessment of pupils using the universal literacy
screening administered pursuant to NRS 388.439 and 388.441;
and
(c) A continuum of layered supports that are evidence-based.
5. As used in this section, “science of reading” means a
method of using interdisciplinary research to understand best
practices for providing literacy instruction.
Sec. 3. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school, as applicable, shall, on or
before June 30 of each year, prepare and submit a report to the
Department describing:
1. The tool or instrument used to administer the universal
literacy screening pursuant to NRS 388.441;
2. The amount of professional development provided
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 2 of section 2 of this act;
3. The number of pupils who were:
(a) Administered a universal literacy screening pursuant to
NRS 388.441;
(b) Identified as having a reading disability, including, without
limitation, dyslexia; and
(c) Provided interventions by the school and the type of
interventions provided; and
4. Longitudinal data on the academic growth of the pupils
described in subsection 3 and pupils who did not receive services
after being administered the universal literacy screening pursuant
to NRS 388.441, reported separately by the grade level of the pupil.
Sec. 4. 1. The board of trustees of a school district or
governing body of a charter school, as applicable, shall not:
-
*SB396_R1*

– 6 –
(a) Assign a teacher to a special education classroom unless
the teacher holds a license to teach special education.
(b) Reassign a teacher who holds a license to teach special
education, paraprofessional or instructional aide from his or her
assignment to serve as a substitute teacher in a general education
classroom.
2. A pupil shall only be placed in a special education
classroom after the individualized education program team for a
pupil has, to the maximum extent appropriate, provided for the
placement of the pupil in the least restrictive environment.
3. A special education classroom may provide instruction to a
pupil in the class to the extent that the individualized education
program for the pupil authorizes such instruction. A special
education classroom:
(a) Shall have a teacher assigned to the classroom who holds
the appropriate endorsement issued pursuant to chapter 391 to
teach pupils with the specific disabilities exhibited;
(b) Shall, for pupils with specific learning disabilities and
speech and language impairments, be tailored toward instruction
and intervention for such disabilities;
(c) Have pupils placed into specific classrooms for moderate or
severe intellectual disabilities based on the needs of the pupil;
(d) Shall not have a difference of more than 3 years between
the age of the oldest pupil assigned to the classroom and the
youngest pupil assigned to the classroom; and
(e) Shall not contain only pupils enrolled in kindergarten.
4. A special education classroom that does not have a
paraprofessional or instructional aide assigned to the classroom
must contain not more than:
(a) Eight pupils with hearing impairments, including, without
limitation, deafness;
(b) Eight pupils with visual impairments, including, without
limitation, blindness;
(c) Three pupils with autism spectrum disorder;
(d) Nine pupils with emotional disturbances;
(e) Twelve pupils with mild intellectual disabilities;
(f) Ten pupils with moderate intellectual disabilities;
(g) Three pupils with severe intellectual disabilities;
(h) Ten pupils with mild or moderate speech and language
impairments;
(i) Eight pupils with severe speech and language impairments;
or
(j) Eight pupils with multiple disabilities.
-
*SB396_R1*

– 7 –
5. A special education classroom that does have a
paraprofessional or instructional aide assigned to the classroom
must maintain a ratio of not more than three pupils with:
(a) Autism spectrum disorder for each paraprofessional or
instructional aide; and
(b) Severe intellectual disabilities for each paraprofessional or
instructional aide.
6. A special education classroom shall have at least two
instructional aides assigned to the classroom when the classroom
contains:
(a) For a special education classroom for pupils enrolled in a
secondary school, more than six pupils.
(b) For a special education classroom for pupils enrolled in
preschool, more than eight pupils.
7. In a classroom in a secondary school in which a pull-out
program is provided to multiple pupils with disabilities by a
teacher using a general education curriculum adapted for
instruction of pupils with disabilities, the classroom must contain:
(a) If an instructional aide is not present, 12 pupils; and
(b) If an instructional aide is present, 16 pupils.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “General education classroom” means a classroom that is
primarily tailored for the instruction of pupils without disabilities.
(b) “Pull-out program” means a program to provide
instruction in at least one subject area to a pupil with a disability
by relocating the pupil from a general education classroom during
instruction in that subject area.
(c) “Special education classroom” means a classroom that is
primarily tailored for the instruction of pupils with disabilities and
contains pupils who have similar educational, behavioral and
other needs, in accordance with the individualized education
programs of such pupils.
Sec. 5. 1. The Department shall develop a plan to establish
stability in providing a program of special education to pupils. In
developing the plan, the Department shall consider, for a program
of special education, the consistency of the:
(a) Location in which special education services are provided;
(b) Curriculum of a program of special education; and
(c) Staffing for a program of special education.
2. When developing an individualized education program for
a pupil with a disability, including, without limitation, autism
spectrum disorder, who is subject to a regression in his or her
ability to learn because of frequent changes in the location in
which special education services are provided, the individualized
education program team must consider, without limitation, the
-
*SB396_R1*

– 8 –
consistency of the location in which special education services are
provided when determining the placement of the pupil within the
public school.
Sec. 6. NRS 388.1321 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.1321 1. The Legislature hereby declares that the
members of a governing body and all administrators and teachers
have a duty to create and provide a safe and respectful learning
environment for all pupils and staff members that is free of
discrimination based on race, bullying and cyber-bullying [.] and
predictable threats of bodily injury.
2. A parent or guardian of a pupil may petition a court of
competent jurisdiction for a writ of mandamus to compel the
performance of any duty imposed by the provisions of NRS 388.121
to 388.1395, inclusive.
3. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to preclude a parent
or guardian of a pupil from seeking any remedy available at law or
in equity.
Sec. 7. NRS 388.243 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.243 1. Each emergency operations plan development
committee established by the board of trustees of a school district
shall develop one plan, which constitutes the minimum requirements
of a plan, to be used by all the public schools other than the charter
schools in the school district in responding to a crisis, emergency or
suicide and all other hazards. Each emergency operations plan
development committee established by the governing body of a
charter school shall develop a plan, which constitutes the minimum
requirements of a plan, to be used by the charter school in
responding to a crisis, emergency or suicide and all other hazards.
Each emergency operations plan development committee shall,
when developing the plan:
(a) Consult with local social service agencies and local public
safety agencies in the county in which its school district or charter
school is located.
(b) If the school district has an emergency manager designated
pursuant to NRS 388.262, consult with the emergency manager.
(c) If the school district has school resource officers, consult
with the school resource officer or a person designated by him or
her.
(d) If the school district has school police officers, consult with
the chief of school police of the school district or a person
designated by him or her.
(e) Consult with the director of the local organization for
emergency management or, if there is no local organization for
emergency management, with the Chief of the Division of
-
*SB396_R1*

– 9 –
Emergency Management of the Office of the Military or his or her
designee.
(f) Consult with the State Fire Marshal or his or her designee
and a representative of a local government responsible for
enforcement of the ordinances, codes or other regulations governing
fire safety.
(g) Determine which persons and organizations in the
community, including, without limitation, a provider of mental
health services which is operated by a state or local agency, that
could be made available to assist pupils and staff in recovering from
a crisis, emergency or suicide.
2. The plan developed pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) The plans, procedures and information included in the model
plan developed by the Department pursuant to NRS 388.253;
(b) A procedure for responding to a crisis or an emergency and
for responding during the period after a crisis or an emergency has
concluded, including, without limitation, a crisis or an emergency
that results in immediate physical harm to a pupil or employee of a
school in the school district or the charter school;
(c) A procedure for enforcing discipline within a school in the
school district or the charter school and for obtaining and
maintaining a safe and orderly environment during a crisis or an
emergency;
(d) The names of persons and organizations in the community,
including, without limitation, a provider of mental health services
which is operated by a state or local agency, that are available to
provide counseling and other services to pupils and staff of the
school to assist them in recovering from a crisis, emergency or
suicide;
(e) A plan for making the persons and organizations described in
paragraph (d) available to pupils and staff after a crisis, emergency
or suicide;
(f) A procedure for responding to a crisis or an emergency that
occurs during an extracurricular activity which takes place on school
grounds;
(g) A plan which includes strategies to assist pupils and staff at a
school in recovering from a suicide;
(h) A description of the organizational structure which ensures
there is a clearly defined hierarchy of authority and responsibility
used by the school for the purpose of responding to a crisis,
emergency or suicide;
(i) If the school district has school police officers, a plan to
coordinate with local law enforcement agencies to train school
police officers in active assailant movement techniques;
-
*SB396_R1*

– 10 –
(j) A plan to coordinate with local law enforcement agencies or
public safety organizations to provide active assailant trainings to
each employee of the school;
(k) A plan to provide support to:
(1) Pupils who have experienced a crisis or emergency by
using trauma-informed and age-appropriate resources; and
(2) Members of the faculty and staff who have experienced a
crisis or emergency by using trauma-informed resources;
(l) A plan to ensure that members of the faculty and staff and a
pupil’s parents or legal guardians are notified of the occurrence,
development and conclusion of a crisis or an emergency through
any communication method established by a school, including,
without limitation, communicating through text message or
electronic mail; [and]
(m) A plan to inform, at least twice each academic year, a
pupil’s parent or legal guardian of any state requirement related to
the storage of firearms, including, without limitation, the crimes and
penalties described in subsection 5 of NRS 202.300 and 202.3623
[.] ;
(n) A consideration of the needs of pupils with disabilities in a
crisis or emergency and a plan to inform local law enforcement
agencies or public safety organizations responding to a crisis or
emergency of the specific needs of each pupil with a disability, to
the extent authorized by the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g; and
(o) A plan to demonstrate that the emergency operations plan
development committee has considered the individual needs of
each pupil with a disability within the school district who has an
individualized education program or a plan developed in
accordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29
U.S.C. § 794.
3. Each emergency operations plan development committee
shall provide for review a copy of the plan that it develops pursuant
to this section to the board of trustees of the school district that
established the committee or the governing body of the charter
school that established the committee.
4. The board of trustees of the school district that established
the committee or the governing body of the charter school that
established the committee shall submit for review to the Division of
Emergency Management of the Office of the Military the plan
developed pursuant to this section.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 388.249 and 388.251,
each public school must comply with the plan developed for it
pursuant to this section.
6. As used in this section:
-
*SB396_R1*

– 11 –
(a) “Active assailant movement techniques” means any training
in the technical and tactical skills necessary for school police
officers to respond to a crisis or emergency concerning an active
assailant.
(b) “Active assailant training” means any training in responding
to a crisis or emergency concerning an active assailant that is
necessary to evacuate or secure the school.
Sec. 8. NRS 388.417 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.417 As used in NRS 388.417 to 388.515, inclusive [:] ,
and sections 1 to 5, inclusive, of this act:
1. “Autism spectrum disorder” has the meaning ascribed to
“autism” in 34 C.F.R. § 300.8(c)(1).
2. “Behavior intervention plan” means a structured,
individualized plan designed to address challenging behaviors that
interfere with the ability of a pupil or his or her peers to learn.
Such a plan is based on the results of a functional behavior
assessment and includes specific and proactive strategies to:
(a) Reduce problematic behaviors;
(b) Teach and reinforce behaviors that are adaptive and
socially acceptable;
(c) Incorporate strategies for providing consequences and
teaching replacement behaviors; and
(d) Collect data to monitor the behavioral progress of a pupil
who has a behavior intervention plan.
3. “Communication mode” means any system or method of
communication used by a person with a disability, including,
without limitation, a person who is deaf or whose hearing is
impaired, to facilitate communication which may include, without
limitation:
(a) American Sign Language;
(b) English-based manual or sign systems;
(c) Oral and aural communication;
(d) Spoken and written English, including speech reading or lip
reading; and
(e) Communication with assistive technology devices.
[2.] 4. “Developmental delay” means a limitation, impairment
or delay in the learning capacity of a child between the ages of 3
and 9 years, based on the child exhibiting difficulties with:
(a) Receptive language;
(b) Expressive language;
(c) Cognitive abilities;
(d) Physical abilities;
(e) Social, emotional or adaptive functions; or
(f) Self-help skills, measured using appropriate diagnostic
instruments and procedures.
-
*SB396_R1*

– 12 –
5. “Due process hearing” means a hearing conducted
pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1415(f)-(i) and 34 C.F.R. §§
300.507-300.512.
6. “Dyslexia” means a [neurological] neurobiological learning
disability characterized by difficulties with accurate and fluent word
recognition and poor spelling and decoding abilities that typically
result from a deficit in the phonological component of language.
Dyslexia is often unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities
and may have secondary consequences, including:
(a) The provision of effective classroom instruction;
(b) Reading comprehension;
(c) Vocabulary growth; and
(d) The attainment of knowledge.
[3.] 7. “Dyslexia intervention” means [systematic,] structured,
multisensory approaches for intervention [offered in an appropriate
setting that is derived from evidence-based research.] that
emphasize instruction in phonemic awareness, phonics and
decoding abilities.
[4.] 8. “Emotional disturbance” has the meaning ascribed to
it in 34 C.F.R. § 300.8(c)(4).
9. “Foundational literacy instruction” means an evidence-
based method of reading instruction using the science of reading
that may be individualized and addresses the acquisition of
language, phonological and phonemic awareness, phonics and
spelling, reading fluency, vocabulary, oral language skills, speech
and reading comprehension.
10. “Free appropriate public education” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(9).
11. “Individualized education program” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)(1)(A).
[5.] 12. “Individualized education program team” has the
meaning ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)(1)(B).
[6.] 13. “Least restrictive environment” means the placement
of a pupil with a disability that complies with the provisions of 20
U.S.C. § 1412(5).
14. “Multi-tiered systems of support” means a three-tiered
method of providing research-based instruction and intervention
to a pupil with an individualized intensity that increases based on
the needs of the pupil and data that is collected to measure the
efficacy of tools used in each tier. The tiers include:
(a) For tier one, universal literacy screenings and research-
based core instructional and behavioral methodologies, practices
and supports designed for all pupils enrolled in programs of
general education;
-
*SB396_R1*

– 13 –
(b) For tier two, supplemental and targeted instruction and
interventions provided, in addition to and in alignment with,
effective core instruction and behavioral support, to a pupil who
needs such additional instructional or behavioral support; and
(c) For tier three, intensive instruction and behavioral support
developed using a problem-solving model that are provided, in
addition to and in alignment with, effective core instruction, to a
pupil to increase his or her rate of academic progress.
15. “Potential indicators of dyslexia or other reading
disabilities” includes, without limitation:
(a) Difficulty in acquiring language skills;
(b) An inability to comprehend oral or written language;
(c) Difficulty in rhyming words;
(d) Difficulty in naming and recognizing letters;
(e) Difficulty with sound-symbol recognition;
(f) Difficulty recognizing and recalling sight words;
(g) Consistent:
(1) Transposition of number sequences;
(2) Reversal of letters;
(3) Inversions of numbers and letters; and
(4) Incorrect substitutions of numbers and letters;
(h) Difficulty in replication of written words; and
(i) Blending sounds while speaking or reading.
16. “Problem-solving model” means a model used to match
instructional resources to educational needs by using data to
define problems, establish performance goals, develop intervention
plans, monitor progress and evaluate pupil outcomes.
17. “Provider of special education” means a school within a
school district or charter school that provides education or services
to pupils with disabilities or any other entity that is responsible for
providing education or services to a pupil with a disability for a
school district or charter school.
[7.] 18. “Pupil who receives early intervening services” means
a person enrolled in kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, who is
not a pupil with a disability but who needs additional academic and
behavioral support to succeed in a regular school program.
[8.] 19. “Pupil with a disability” means a “child with a
disability,” as that term is defined in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(3)(A), who is
under 22 years of age.
[9.] 20. “Reading proficiency” means the ability of a pupil to
achieve a result on a universal literacy screening, diagnostic
assessment, standardized assessment or other measure of
monitoring the progress of the pupil that is appropriate based on
his or her grade level.
-
*SB396_R1*

– 14 –
21. “Response to scientific, research-based intervention”
means a [collaborative] process of providing high-quality
instruction and interventions which [assesses] are matched to a
pupil’s [response to scientific, research-based intervention that is
matched to the needs of a pupil and that systematically monitors the
level of performance and rate of] needs by using the learning rate of
the pupil over time [for the purpose of making data-based] and the
level of performance of the pupil to make instructional decisions
[concerning the need of the pupil for increasingly intensified
services.
10.] for the pupil.
22. “Science of reading” means a method of using
interdisciplinary research to understand best practices for
providing literacy instruction.
23. “Screening period” means the period of time required to
administer a universal literacy screening pursuant to NRS 388.441
and determine the results of the screening.
24. “Specific learning disability” means a disorder in one or
more of the basic psychological processes involved in understanding
or using spoken or written language which is not primarily the result
of a visual, hearing or motor impairment, intellectual disability,
serious emotional disturbance, or an environmental, cultural or
economic disadvantage. Such a disorder may manifest itself in an
imperfect ability to listen, think, speak, read, write, spell or perform
mathematical calculations. The term includes, without limitation,
perceptual disabilities, brain injury, minimal brain dysfunction,
dyslexia and developmental aphasia.
25. “Structured literacy” means a structured, systematic,
sequential, direct, explicit, diagnostic, prescriptive and
multisensory approach to providing reading instruction to pupils
that breaks down reading and spelling skills into individual
components.
26. “Supplemental reading instruction” means using the
science of reading, evidence-based, sequential, systematic, explicit
and cumulative methods of teaching phonemic awareness and
processing, phonics and vocabulary skills to support the
development of the skills of a pupil in decoding, spelling, reading
fluency and comprehension so that the pupil possesses such skills
appropriate for a pupil enrolled in his or her grade.
27. “Universal literacy screening” means the method for
gathering information about the literacy skills of pupils to identify
or predict the risk of pupils experiencing reading difficulties and
inform instruction, differentiate targeted interventions, determine
if additional assessments are required and evaluate the
effectiveness of curricula as a measure of outcomes, as prescribed
-
*SB396_R1*

– 15 –
pursuant to NRS 388.439 and administered pursuant to
NRS 388.441.
Sec. 9. NRS 388.419 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.419 1. The Department shall:
(a) Prescribe a form that contains the basic information
necessary for the uniform development, review and revision of an
individualized education program for a pupil with a disability in
accordance with 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d); and
(b) Make the form available on a computer disc for use by
school districts and, upon request, in any other manner deemed
reasonable by the Department.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, each school
district shall ensure that the form prescribed by the Department is
used for the development, review and revision of an individualized
education program for each pupil with a disability who receives
special education in the school district. A school district may use an
expanded form that contains additions to the form prescribed by the
Department if the basic information contained in the expanded form
complies with the form prescribed by the Department.
3. The State Board:
(a) Shall prescribe minimum standards for the special education
of pupils with disabilities.
(b) May prescribe minimum standards for the provision of early
intervening services.
(c) Shall develop and issue guidelines to assist with developing
procedures and protocols for administering universal literacy
screenings pursuant to NRS 388.439.
4. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board must
include standards for programs of instruction or special services
maintained for the purpose of serving pupils with:
(a) Hearing impairments, including, but not limited to, deafness.
(b) Visual impairments, including, but not limited to, blindness.
(c) Orthopedic impairments.
(d) Speech and language impairments.
(e) Intellectual disabilities.
(f) Multiple impairments.
(g) Emotional disturbances.
(h) Other health impairments.
(i) Specific learning disabilities.
(j) Autism spectrum disorders.
(k) Traumatic brain injuries.
(l) Developmental delays.
5. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board for
pupils with hearing impairments, including, without limitation,
-
*SB396_R1*

– 16 –
deafness, pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 4 must comply
with:
(a) The Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C.
§§ 1400 et seq., and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto;
(b) The effective communication requirement of Title II of the
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12131 et
seq., and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(c) Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. §
794, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
6. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board for
pupils with dyslexia pursuant to paragraph (i) of subsection 4 must
include, without limitation : [, standards for instruction on:
(a) Phonemic awareness to enable a pupil to detect, segment,
blend and manipulate sounds in spoken language;
(b) Graphonomic knowledge for teaching the sounds associated
with letters in the English language;
(c) The structure of the English language, including, without
limitation, morphology, semantics, syntax and pragmatics;
(d) Linguistic instruction directed toward proficiency and
fluency with the patterns of language so that words and sentences
are carriers of meaning; and
(e) Strategies that a pupil may use for decoding, encoding, word
recognition, fluency and comprehension.]
(a) Tasks for teaching phoneme segmentation and
manipulation;
(b) Rapid naming skills, including, without limitation, sound-
symbol recognition and fluency in naming letters;
(c) Phonological memory, including, without limitation, the
repetition of non-words, oral vocabulary and reading fluency;
(d) Decoding skills;
(e) Encoding skills; and
(f) Oral reading fluency for determining areas of difficulty.
7. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board for
pupils with emotional disturbances, autism spectrum disorders or
developmental delays pursuant to paragraphs (g), (j) and (l) of
subsection 4 must include, without limitation, a requirement that:
(a) The individualized education program for a pupil with an
emotional disturbance, autism spectrum disorder or a
developmental delay provide for:
(1) Treatment from a behavior analyst; and
(2) When necessary to address the behavior of a pupil, the
development of a behavior intervention plan;
(b) Each public school shall:
(1) Require the assignment of a behavior analyst to each
classroom that contains a pupil with severe behaviors, an
-
*SB396_R1*

– 17 –
emotional disturbance, autism spectrum disorder or a
developmental delay; and
(2) Ensure that there is a ratio of at least one behavior
analyst for each two classrooms containing such pupils;
(c) Each behavior analyst assigned to a classroom pursuant to
paragraph (b) must provide regular consultations and assist in the
review of a behavior intervention plan; and
(d) Each pupil who receives special programs of instruction or
services due to a developmental delay must, upon reaching 10
years of age, be re-evaluated pursuant to NRS 388.433 to
determine whether the pupil requires additional services for pupils
with disabilities.
8. No apportionment of state money may be made to any
school district or charter school for the instruction of pupils with
disabilities until the program of instruction maintained therein for
such pupils is approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
as meeting the minimum standards prescribed by the State Board.
[8.] 9. The Department shall, upon the request of the board of
trustees of a school district, provide information to the board of
trustees concerning the identification and evaluation of pupils with
disabilities in accordance with the standards prescribed by the State
Board.
[9.] 10. The Department shall post on the Internet website
maintained by the Department the data that is submitted to the
United States Secretary of Education pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1418
within 30 days after submission of the data to the Secretary in a
manner that does not result in the disclosure of data that is
identifiable to an individual pupil.
11. As used in this section, “behavior analyst” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 641D.030.
Sec. 10. NRS 388.439 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.439 1. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the] The board of trustees of each school district shall prescribe for
use by the [elementary] schools located in the school district [an
early] a universal literacy screening [assessment] that [meets the
requirements set forth in subsection 3.] must be provided to each
pupil enrolled in kindergarten or grade 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 or 6 in the
school district.
2. The governing body of each charter school that serves pupils
in kindergarten or grade 1, 2 , [or] 3 , 4, 5 or 6 shall prescribe [an
early] a universal literacy screening [assessment] for use by the
charter school that [meets the requirements set forth in subsection
3.] must be provided to each pupil enrolled in the charter school in
kindergarten or grade 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 or 6.
-
*SB396_R1*

– 18 –
3. The [early] universal literacy screening [assessment]
prescribed pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 must , [include,] without
limitation : [, screening for:]
(a) For each pupil, measure his or her:
(1) Phonological and phonemic awareness;
[(b)] (2) Sound-symbol recognition;
[(c) Alphabet knowledge;
(d)] (3) Decoding skills;
[(e) Rapid naming skills;]
(4) Reading fluency;
(5) Reading comprehension; [and
(f)] (6) Encoding skills [.] ; and
(7) Knowledge of the alphabet;
(b) Be developed and implemented using:
(1) Evidence-based strategies for assessing the literacy of a
pupil;
(2) Accepted and reliable instruments for conducting a
literacy screening for a pupil enrolled in kindergarten or grade 1,
2, 3, 4, 5 or 6, as appropriate; and
(3) Strategies for the analysis of data concerning assessing
the literacy of a pupil; and
(c) Identify pupils who have a potential reading disability,
including, without limitation, dyslexia.
4. A universal literacy screening prescribed pursuant to this
section must be administered to each applicable pupil at least twice
during each school year. The first universal literacy screening
must occur not later than 90 days after the first day of instruction
in the school year and be used to determine the reading
proficiency of the pupil. The board of trustees of each school
district and the governing body of each charter school that
administers a universal literacy screening must attempt to adhere
to best practices concerning the frequency of administering such
screenings.
5. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall, not later than 20 days
after administering an initial universal literacy screening to a
pupil pursuant to this section:
(a) Provide a written notification to the parent or legal
guardian of the pupil of the pupil’s results on the universal
literacy screening. The notification must include:
(1) An identification of the results of the pupil on the
universal literacy screening and a comparison of his or her results
to the typical score for a pupil enrolled in the same grade level;
-
*SB396_R1*

– 19 –
(2) Information concerning services available to the pupil
based on his or her results on the universal literacy screening,
including, without limitation:
(I) Multi-tiered systems of support for dyslexia
intervention;
(II) Foundational literacy instruction, structured
literacy and supplemental reading instruction necessary to
meeting the reading proficiency goals of the pupil;
(III) Information on resources for a pupil with dyslexia
and support provided to the pupil by the school district or charter
school for the parent or legal guardian of such a pupil; and
(IV) An explanation of the rights the parent or legal
guardian of the pupil may assert in accordance with the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et
seq.; and
(3) A plan for providing the parent or legal guardian of the
pupil with regular updates concerning the progress of the pupil;
and
(b) Begin providing a pupil who shows indicators of dyslexia
or literacy levels below those typical for a pupil enrolled in the
same grade level with individualized interventions, including,
without limitation, structured literacy.
6. The Department shall adopt regulations that set forth the
process by which data from the results of the universal literacy
screening are reported to the Department.
Sec. 11. NRS 388.441 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.441 1. The board of trustees of a school district or the
governing body of a charter school, as applicable, shall administer
the [early] universal literacy screening [assessment] prescribed
pursuant to NRS 388.439 to each pupil enrolled in kindergarten or
grade 1, 2 , [or] 3 , 4, 5 or 6 who:
(a) Has exhibited at least one indicator of a learning disability,
including, without limitation, potential indicators [for] of dyslexia;
and
(b) Needs intervention.
2. If [an early] a universal literacy screening [assessment]
administered pursuant to subsection 1 confirms that a pupil has
indicators for learning disabilities, including, without limitation,
dyslexia, or the parent or legal guardian of the pupil or a teacher,
school counselor or school psychologist employed by the school
district in which the pupil is enrolled requests additional screening
or evaluations, the board of trustees of a school district or
governing body of a charter school, as applicable, shall [address the
needs of] ensure that the pupil [through the response to scientific,
research-based intervention system of instruction.
-
*SB396_R1*

– 20 –
3. If the response to scientific, research-based intervention
system of instruction determines that a pupil needs] receives
additional screening or evaluations in order to determine whether
the pupil has a specific learning disability, including, without
limitation, dyslexia . [:
(a) The pupil must receive additional testing by a trained
professional using a norm-referenced test; and
(b) The board of trustees of the school district or the governing
body of the charter school, as applicable, shall perform a
comprehensive evaluation for the pupil in addition to the required
response to scientific, research-based intervention system of
instruction.]
3. A universal literacy screening administered pursuant to
subsection 1, and any additional screenings or evaluations
administered pursuant to subsection 2, must be administered by a
teacher or staff member who has received the professional
development required pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 2 of
section 2 of this act.
4. If there is no record of a pupil previously being screened
for reading disabilities, including, without limitation, dyslexia, the
board of trustees of a school district or the governing body of a
charter school, as applicable, must promptly administer the
universal literacy screening to the pupil. The universal literacy
screening must be administered:
(a) At the same time as the universal literacy screening is
administered to pupils enrolled in the same grade in which the
pupil is enrolled; or
(b) If the other pupils enrolled in the same grade in which the
pupil is enrolled have already received the universal literacy
screening, not later than 90 calendar days after the pupil enrolls
in the school district or charter school.
5. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall, after receiving the
results of the universal literacy screening administered pursuant
to this section, meet with the administrators of each school within
the school district or the charter school, as applicable, and discuss
the results of the universal literacy screening and data for
monitoring the progress of pupils. An administrator that
participates in a meeting pursuant to this subsection must
disseminate the results and data to teachers assigned to the school
or charter school to which the administrator is assigned, as
applicable, for the purpose of providing guidance in planning and
providing appropriate instruction and evidence-based
interventions to pupils based on the results of each pupil on the
-
*SB396_R1*

– 21 –
universal literacy screening and any additional screening
conducted pursuant to subsection 2.
6. The board of trustees of a school district or governing body
of a charter school shall not administer the universal literacy
screening pursuant to this section for the purpose of delaying the
referral of a pupil for special education services.
Sec. 12. NRS 388.443 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.443 When developing an individualized education
program for a pupil with dyslexia in accordance with NRS 388.419,
the pupil’s individualized education program team shall consider,
without limitation : [, the following instructional approaches:]
1. Any existing evaluation data on the pupil, including,
without limitation, evaluations and related information provided
by the parent or legal guardian of the pupil, as required pursuant
to the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C.
§ 1414(c)(1)(A)(i);
2. The concerns of the parent or legal guardian of the pupil
for enhancing the education of the pupil, as required pursuant to
20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)(3)(A)(ii);
3. The results of the pupil on the universal literacy screening
administered pursuant to NRS 388.441;
4. The framework established pursuant to subsection 3 of
section 2 of this act;
5. The least restrictive environment in which the pupil may be
placed;
6. The provision of an appropriate and evidence-based
approach for the instruction of pupils with dyslexia that is
provided by a teacher who holds an endorsement to teach pupils
with disabilities. Such an approach must be taught using
instructional approaches that include, without limitation:
(a) Methods of teaching literacy to a pupil that are
individualized to address the specific needs of the pupil;
(b) Explicit, direct instruction that is systematic, sequential and
cumulative and follows a logical plan of presenting the alphabetic
principle that targets the specific needs of the pupil;
[2.] (c) Individualized instruction to meet the specific needs of
the pupil [in an appropriate setting] that uses intensive, highly-
concentrated and specialized instruction methods and materials that
maximize pupil engagement;
[3.] (d) Meaning-based instruction directed at purposeful
reading and writing, with an emphasis on comprehension and
composition; and
[4.] (e) Multisensory instruction that incorporates the
simultaneous use of two or more sensory pathways during teacher
presentations and pupil practice [.] ; and
-
*SB396_R1*

– 22 –
7. The use of multi-tiered systems of support to provide
dyslexia intervention, foundational literacy instruction, structured
literacy and supplemental reading instruction.
Sec. 13. NRS 388.463 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.463 1. The Department shall maintain a list of hearing
officers who meet the qualifications prescribed pursuant to 20
U.S.C. § 1415(f)(3)(A) to conduct a due process hearing pursuant to
the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400
et seq., regarding the identification, evaluation, reevaluation,
classification, educational placement or disciplinary action of or
provision of a free appropriate public education to a pupil with a
disability.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, upon the filing
of a complaint requiring a due process hearing described in
subsection 1, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall select
three hearing officers from the list maintained by the Department
pursuant to subsection 1. The selection of the hearing officers must
be made on a random, rotational or other impartial basis and, in a
school district in which more than 50,000 pupils are enrolled, the
place of business of the hearing officer must, to the extent
practicable, be located in the school district.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall provide the
names of the three hearing officers selected pursuant to subsection 2
to the complainant and request the complainant to return to the
Superintendent a list which places the three names in the order of
preference of the complainant. The complainant must return the list
within 2 days. If the complainant returns the list, the Superintendent
must request the first hearing officer on the list to preside over the
hearing and if he or she is unavailable, the next person, until there
are no more hearing officers on the list. If the complainant does not
return the list within 2 days, the Superintendent must appoint a
hearing officer and may determine the order in which to request a
hearing officer to preside over the hearing.
4. If a due process hearing is required to be expedited pursuant
to 20 U.S.C. § 1415(k)(4), the Superintendent of Public Instruction
must select a hearing officer to preside over the hearing from the list
maintained by the Department pursuant to subsection 1. The
selection of the hearing officer must be made on a random,
rotational or other impartial basis and, in a school district in which
more than 50,000 pupils are enrolled, the place of business of the
hearing officer must, to the extent practicable, be located in the
school district. Before arranging an expedited due process
hearing, the board of trustees of the school district or governing
body of the charter school must provide the complainant with
information on free or low-cost legal services available to the
-
*SB396_R1*

– 23 –
complainant. The hearing officer must base his or her decision in
an expedited due process hearing on the provisions of the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et
seq., and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The expedited
due process hearing must occur not later than 15 days after the
request for a due process hearing is filed. The hearing officer
must issue a decision not later than 10 school days after the
hearing has concluded.
5. The local educational agency or governing body of a charter
school involved in the complaint, as applicable, shall pay the cost of
the hearing, including, without limitation, any compensation to
which the hearing officer is entitled.
6. The decision of a hearing officer may be appealed by any
aggrieved party to the Department. The Department shall appoint a
State Review Officer to make a determination regarding an appeal
submitted pursuant to this subsection. The Officer must, without
limitation:
(a) Be an attorney admitted to the State Bar of Nevada;
(b) Demonstrate knowledge of the provisions of the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, any relevant laws and
regulations of this State and any relevant case law;
(c) Possess the knowledge of and ability to conduct a hearing
and render and write a determination in accordance with
appropriate and standard legal practices; and
(d) Be impartial and possess no personal, pecuniary or
professional interest in the dispute submitted for an appeal
pursuant to this subsection.
7. The Officer must, subject to his or her own determination
or the good faith application of a party to the dispute submitted for
an appeal pursuant to subsection 6 recuse himself or herself from
the matter and notify the Department of the recusal if the Officer:
(a) Has been substantially involved in the development of any
state or local law, regulation, policy or procedure that is at issue in
the hearing or appeal;
(b) Has, at any time, been personally involved in any aspect of
the identification, evaluation or educational placement of the
pupil who is the subject of the due process hearing and the appeal
submitted pursuant to subsection 6, or any other similarly situated
pupils enrolled in the school district in which such a pupil is
enrolled; or
(c) Was previously, or currently is, employed by the
Department in a position that requires routine involvement in
developing policies or making decisions concerning the provision
of free appropriate public education to a pupil with a disability.
-
*SB396_R1*

– 24 –
8. If an Officer recuses himself or herself pursuant to
subsection 7, the Department shall appoint a new Officer to hear
the appeal submitted pursuant to subsection 6.
9. When a due process hearing or expedited due process
hearing is ongoing, the school in which the pupil involved in the
dispute is enrolled must comply with the provisions governing the
placement of such pupils set forth in 34 C.F.R. § 300.533.
10. At any time while a due process hearing or expedited due
process hearing is ongoing or awaiting a final decision, either
party to the dispute may submit to the hearing officer or State
Review Officer a written request for a temporary order of relief,
accompanied by an affidavit or notarized statement stating the
specific relief sought and the justification for relief. The party
which submits a request for relief must provide a copy of the
request to the opposing party. A party may seek such relief
regarding:
(a) An interruption in the provision of special education
services to the pupil who is the subject of the dispute;
(b) Disciplinary action taken against the pupil, including,
without limitation, a manifestation determination or determination
of an interim alternate educational setting;
(c) The placement of the pupil while the due process hearing
or expedited due process hearing is ongoing or awaiting a final
decision; or
(d) The participation of the pupil in any graduation
ceremonies.
11. A hearing officer or State Review Officer may grant a
request for a temporary order of relief pursuant to subsection 10 if
he or she determines that:
(a) The petitioner will suffer irreparable harm if the requested
relief is not granted;
(b) The legal right to relief has been established in relevant
case law;
(c) The petitioner is likely to prevail on the merits; and
(d) When the equities and interests of the parties are balanced,
the petitioner will suffer greater harm than the respondent if the
requested relief is not granted.
12. As used in this section [, “local] :
(a) “Expedited due process hearing” means a due process
hearing that is required to be expedited pursuant to 20 U.S.C.
§ 1415(k)(4).
(b) “Local educational agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
20 U.S.C. § 1401(19).
-
*SB396_R1*

– 25 –
(c) “Manifestation determination” means a determination of
whether the conduct of a pupil is a manifestation of his or her
disability made pursuant to 34 C.F.R. § 300.530(e).
(d) “Officer” means the State Review Officer appointed
pursuant to subsection 6.
Sec. 13.5. NRS 392.466 is hereby amended to read as follows:
392.466 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any
pupil who sells or distributes any controlled substance while on the
premises of any public school, at an activity sponsored by a public
school or on any school bus shall meet with the school and his or
her parent or legal guardian. The school shall provide a plan of
action based on restorative justice to the parent or legal guardian of
the pupil or, if the pupil is an unaccompanied pupil, the pupil. The
pupil may be suspended, expelled or permanently expelled from the
school, except that:
(a) A pupil who is less than 11 years of age may not be expelled
or permanently expelled pursuant to this subsection.
(b) A pupil who is less than 6 years of age may be suspended
pursuant to this subsection, and the suspension must be reviewed
and approved by the superintendent of the school district or the
administrative head of the charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, or his or her designee.
(c) For a pupil with a disability who has been suspended or
expelled pursuant to this subsection, the school in which the pupil is
enrolled shall make available to the pupil a free appropriate public
education in compliance with the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., for each school day the
pupil is suspended or expelled after the pupil has been removed for
10 cumulative days.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any pupil who
commits a battery against an employee of the school while on the
premises of any public school, at an activity sponsored by a public
school or on any school bus shall meet with the school and his or
her parent or legal guardian. The school shall provide a plan of
action based on restorative justice to the parent or legal guardian of
the pupil or, if the pupil is an unaccompanied pupil, the pupil. The
pupil may be suspended, expelled or permanently expelled from the
school, except that:
(a) A pupil who is less than 8 years of age may not be expelled
or permanently expelled pursuant to this subsection.
(b) A pupil who is less than 6 years of age may be suspended
pursuant to this subsection, and the suspension must be reviewed
and approved by the superintendent of the school district or the
administrative head of the charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, or his or her designee.
-
*SB396_R1*

– 26 –
(c) For a pupil with a disability who has been suspended or
expelled pursuant to this subsection, the school in which the pupil is
enrolled shall make available to the pupil a free appropriate public
education in compliance with the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., for each school day the
pupil is suspended or expelled after the pupil has been removed for
10 cumulative days.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any pupil who
commits a battery which is intended to result in the bodily injury of
an employee of the school while on the premises of any public
school, at an activity sponsored by a public school or on any school
bus shall meet with the school and his or her parent or legal
guardian. The school shall provide a plan of action based on
restorative justice to the parent or legal guardian of the pupil or, if
the pupil is an unaccompanied pupil, the pupil. The pupil must be
suspended, expelled or permanently expelled from the school,
except that:
(a) A pupil who is less than 8 years of age may not be expelled
or permanently expelled pursuant to this subsection.
(b) A pupil who is less than 6 years of age may be suspended
pursuant to this subsection, and the suspension must be reviewed
and approved by the superintendent of the school district or the
administrative head of the charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, or his or her designee.
(c) For a pupil with a disability who has been suspended or
expelled pursuant to this subsection, the school in which the pupil is
enrolled shall make available to the pupil a free appropriate public
education in compliance with the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., for each school day the
pupil is suspended or expelled after the pupil has been removed for
10 cumulative days.
4. An employee who is a victim of a battery which is intended
to result in the bodily injury of an employee of the school may
appeal to the school a plan of action provided pursuant to subsection
3 if:
(a) The employee feels any actions taken pursuant to such plan
are inappropriate; and
(b) For a pupil with a disability who committed the battery, the
board of trustees of the school district or the governing body of the
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as
applicable, or its designee has reviewed the circumstances and
determined that such an appeal is in compliance with the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any pupil,
including, without limitation, a pupil with a disability, who poses a
-
*SB396_R1*

– 27 –
continuing danger to persons or property or an ongoing threat of
disrupting the academic process or who is found in possession of a
dangerous weapon other than a firearm while on the premises of any
public school, at an activity sponsored by a public school or on any
school bus may be removed from the public school immediately
upon being given an explanation of the reasons for the removal of
the pupil and pending proceedings, which must be conducted as
soon as practicable after removal, for his or her suspension,
expulsion or permanent expulsion, except that:
(a) A pupil who is less than 11 years of age may not be expelled
or permanently expelled pursuant to this subsection.
(b) A pupil who is less than 6 years of age may be suspended
pursuant to this subsection only after the suspension is reviewed and
approved by the superintendent of the school district or the
administrative head of the charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, or his or her designee.
(c) For a pupil with a disability who has been suspended or
expelled pursuant to this subsection, the public school in which the
pupil is enrolled shall make available to the pupil a free appropriate
public education in compliance with the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., for each
school day the pupil is suspended or expelled after the pupil has
been removed for 10 cumulative days.
(d) Before a pupil with a disability is suspended or expelled
pursuant to this subsection, an administrator shall meet with the
individualized education program team for the pupil and
determine, in accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1415, that the behavior of the pupil is
not a manifestation of his or her disability.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any pupil,
including, without limitation, a pupil with a disability, who is found
in possession of a firearm while on the premises of any public
school, at an activity sponsored by a public school or on any school
bus must be removed from the public school immediately upon
being given an explanation of the reasons for the removal of the
pupil and pending proceedings, which must be conducted as soon as
practicable after removal, for his or her suspension, expulsion or
permanent expulsion. A pupil who is:
(a) Eleven years of age or older shall be suspended, expelled or
permanently expelled pursuant to this section.
(b) At least 8 but less than 11 years of age shall be suspended or
expelled pursuant to this subsection.
(c) At least 6 but less than 8 years of age may be suspended
pursuant to this subsection.
-
*SB396_R1*

– 28 –
(d) Less than 6 years of age may be suspended pursuant to this
subsection only after the suspension is reviewed and approved by
the superintendent of the school district or the administrative head
of the charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils, as applicable, or his or her designee.
(e) A pupil with a disability who has been suspended or expelled
pursuant to this subsection must be provided with a free appropriate
public education in compliance with the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., by the public
school in which the pupil is enrolled for each school day the pupil is
suspended or expelled after the pupil has been removed for 10
cumulative days.
7. If a school is unable to retain a pupil in the school pursuant
to subsections 1 to 6, inclusive, for the safety of any person or
because doing so would not be in the best interest of the pupil, the
pupil may be suspended, expelled or placed in another school. If a
pupil, including, without limitation, a pupil who is less than 11 years
of age, is placed in another school, the current school of the pupil
shall explain what services will be provided to the pupil at the new
school that the current school is unable to provide to address the
specific needs and behaviors of the pupil. The current school of the
pupil shall coordinate with the new school to create a plan of action
based on restorative justice for the pupil and to ensure that any
resources required to execute the plan of action based on restorative
justice are available at the new school.
8. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a pupil is
deemed a habitual disciplinary problem pursuant to NRS 392.4655
and the school has made a reasonable effort to complete a plan of
action based on restorative justice with the pupil, based on the
seriousness of the acts which were the basis for the discipline, the
pupil may be:
(a) Suspended from the school; or
(b) Expelled from the school under extraordinary circumstances
as determined by the principal of the school.
9. If the pupil is expelled, or the period of the pupil’s
suspension is for one school semester, the pupil must:
(a) Enroll in a private school pursuant to chapter 394 of NRS or
be homeschooled;
(b) Enroll in a program of independent study provided pursuant
to NRS 389.155 for pupils who have been suspended or expelled
from public school or a program of distance education provided
pursuant to NRS 388.820 to 388.874, inclusive, if the pupil qualifies
for enrollment and is accepted for enrollment in accordance with the
requirements of the applicable program; or
-
*SB396_R1*

– 29 –
(c) Enroll in a program of alternative education provided by the
school district in which the pupil resides. Each school district shall,
alone or through a partnership with another school district, provide a
program of alternative education pursuant to this paragraph in an in-
person setting that allows each pupil enrolled in the program to
receive educational services in the least restrictive educational
environment.
10. The superintendent of schools of a school district or the
administrative head of a charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, may, for good cause shown
in a particular case in that school district or public school, as
applicable, allow a modification to a suspension or expulsion
pursuant to subsections 1 to 8, inclusive, if such modification is set
forth in writing. The superintendent or the administrative head of a
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as
applicable, shall allow such a modification if he or she determines
that a plan of action based on restorative justice may be used
successfully.
11. This section does not prohibit a pupil from having in his or
her possession a knife or firearm with the approval of the principal
of the school. A principal may grant such approval only in
accordance with the policies or regulations adopted by the board of
trustees of the school district or the governing body of the charter
school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as
applicable.
12. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 or 6, a pupil
with a disability who is at least 11 years of age may, in accordance
with the procedural policy adopted by the board of trustees of the
school district or the governing body of the charter school or
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, for
such matters and only after the board of trustees of the school
district or governing body, as applicable, or its designee has
reviewed the circumstances with the individualized education
program team for the pupil and determined that the action is in
compliance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20
U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., be:
(a) Suspended from school pursuant to this section for not more
than 10 days. Such a suspension may be imposed pursuant to
this paragraph for each occurrence of conduct proscribed by
subsection 1.
(b) Expelled from school pursuant to this section.
(c) Permanently expelled from school pursuant to this section.
13. A homeless pupil or a pupil in foster care may be
suspended from school pursuant to this section for not more than 5
days if, following a review of all available information, the principal
-
*SB396_R1*

– 30 –
determines that the conduct of the pupil poses an ongoing threat to
the pupil or other persons at the school and if a determination is
made that homelessness or being in foster care was not a factor in
the behavior that led to the consideration for suspension or
expulsion. The person responsible for making a determination of
whether or not homelessness or being in foster care was a factor in
the behavior shall presume that homelessness or being in foster care
was not a factor in the behavior unless the person determines
otherwise pursuant to this subsection. A determination that
homelessness was not a factor in the behavior must be made in
consultation with the local educational agency liaison for homeless
pupils designated in accordance with the McKinney-Vento
Homeless Assistance Act of 1987, 42 U.S.C. §§ 11301 et seq., or a
contact person at a school, including, without limitation, a school
counselor or school social worker. A determination that being in
foster care was not a factor in the behavior must be made in
consultation with an advocate for pupils in foster care at the school
in which the pupil is enrolled or the school counselor of the pupil.
14. The principal of a public school may, at his or her
discretion, reduce or eliminate the period of suspension, convert an
expulsion to a suspension or otherwise reduce, eliminate or alter a
disciplinary action imposed upon a pupil who commits a battery
which results in the bodily injury of an employee of the school.
15. The principal of a public school may reduce the period of
suspension or convert an expulsion to a suspension for a pupil who
distributes a controlled substance while on the premises of a public
school, at an activity sponsored by a public school or on a school
bus if:
(a) The pupil is less than 11 years of age;
(b) The pupil has not engaged in such proscribed conduct
before; and
(c) After a thorough review of the facts and circumstances, the
principal determines that the pupil did not know that the substance
being distributed was a controlled substance.
16. The provisions of chapter 241 of NRS do not apply to any
hearing or proceeding conducted pursuant to this section. Such
hearings or proceedings must be closed to the public.
17. As used in this section:
(a) “Battery” has the meaning ascribed to it in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of NRS 200.481.
(b) “Bodily injury” means any actual damage or injury to a
person that interferes with or is detrimental to the health of the
person and is more than merely accidental, transient or trifling in
nature.
-
*SB396_R1*

– 31 –
(c) “Dangerous weapon” includes, without limitation, a
blackjack, slungshot, billy, sand-club, sandbag, metal knuckles, dirk
or dagger, a nunchaku or trefoil, as defined in NRS 202.350, a
butterfly knife or any other knife described in NRS 202.350, a
switchblade knife as defined in NRS 202.265, or any other object
which is used, or threatened to be used, in such a manner and under
such circumstances as to pose a threat of, or cause, bodily injury to a
person.
(d) “Firearm” includes, without limitation, any pistol, revolver,
shotgun, explosive substance or device, and any other item included
within the definition of a “firearm” in 18 U.S.C. § 921, as that
section existed on July 1, 1995.
(e) “Foster care” has the meaning ascribed to it in 45 C.F.R.
§ 1355.20.
(f) “Homeless pupil” has the meaning ascribed to the term
“homeless children and youths” in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2).
(g) “Permanently expelled” means the disciplinary removal of a
pupil from the school in which the pupil is currently enrolled:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2),
without the possibility of returning to the school in which the pupil
is currently enrolled or another public school within the school
district; and
(2) With the possibility of enrolling in a program or public
school for alternative education for pupils who are expelled or
permanently expelled after being permanently expelled.
(h) “Restorative justice” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 392.472.
(i) “Unaccompanied pupil” has the meaning ascribed to the term
“unaccompanied youth” in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(6).
18. The provisions of this section do not prohibit a pupil who is
suspended or expelled from enrolling in a charter school that is
designed exclusively for the enrollment of pupils with disciplinary
problems if the pupil is accepted for enrollment by the charter
school pursuant to NRS 388A.453 or 388A.456. Upon request, the
governing body of a charter school must be provided with access to
the records of the pupil relating to the pupil’s suspension or
expulsion in accordance with applicable federal and state law before
the governing body makes a decision concerning the enrollment of
the pupil.
Sec. 13.7. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall, on or before July 1,
2027, submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education describing:
-
*SB396_R1*

– 32 –
1. The plans of the school district or charter school, as
applicable, for implementing the provisions of this act;
2. Any fiscal, staffing, logistical or other challenges that the
school district or charter school reasonably expects to encounter that
may impede implementation of the provisions of this act; and
3. Any progress the school district or charter school has made
towards implementing the provisions of this act.
Sec. 14. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 15. 1. This section and sections 13 to 14, inclusive, of
this act become effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Sections 1 to 12, inclusive, of this act become effective on
July 1, 2027.
H
-
*SB396_R1*